Utah statutes.
59-1-101.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Commission" and "tax commission" mean the State Tax Commission.

(2)  "Deficiency" is as defined in Section 59-1-1402.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2009 General Session

